Montana, session 2025, HB566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 10-2-901, MCA, is amended to read:
"10-2-901. Decennial veterans' long-term care needs study. (1) On receipt of the most recent
federal census data, the department of public health and human services Montana veterans' affairs division, in
consultation with the Montana veterans' affairs division department of public health and human services, shall
perform an analysis of the long-term care needs of veterans in the state, known as the decennial veterans'
long-term care needs study.
(2) The study must determine the demographics of the Montana veteran population, including the
number and age of veterans in each county and the type of long-term care needs of the population. The long-
term care assessment for veterans study must also include evaluation of the need for nursing home,
domiciliary, and Alzheimer's disease support services, as well as the various types of community and in-home
care that are needed any other care needs identified by the Montana veterans' affairs division and by
stakeholders.
(3) The study must include a personal survey of the Montana veteran population, including online
and paper options and focus groups.
(4) This study must be conducted in collaboration with stakeholders, including but not limited to
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 566
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 566
veterans' outreach organizations, legislators, caregivers, and other local groups that work directly with the
Montana veteran population. The Montana veterans' affairs division may form an advisory committee comprised
of stakeholders to assist with the survey.
(4)(5) The study must evaluate existing veterans' home services and the configuration of those
services with respect to the needs identified.
(5)(6) The study must include an analysis of the need for additional state veterans' cemeteries,
including their placement within the state.
(7) The Montana veterans' affairs division shall prepare an outreach and marketing plan prior to
the start of the study."
Section 2. Section 10-2-902, MCA, is amended to read:
"10-2-902. Department of public health and human services Montana veterans' affairs division
to conduct study. The staff of the senior and long-term care division within the department of public health and
human services Montana veterans' affairs division shall conduct the decennial veterans' long-term care needs
study. The staff of the Montana veterans' affairs division senior and long-term care division within the
department of public health and human services shall provide support as needed."
Section 3. Section 10-2-903, MCA, is amended to read:
"10-2-903. Survey report required Reporting requirements -- plan and budget. (1) (a) During the
interim prior to the availability of the most recent federal census data, the staff of the Montana veterans' affairs
division shall present a plan for conducting the study required in 10-2-901, including a budget estimate, to the
state administration and veterans' affairs interim committee.
(b) After hearing the study plan and budget estimate, the state administration and veterans' affairs
interim committee may request a committee bill with an appropriation to fund the study.
(2) The Montana veterans' affairs division shall provide at least one update to the state
administration and veterans' affairs interim committee while the study is being conducted. The committee may
request additional updates as needed.
(3) As soon as possible after the completion of the decennial survey study, the department of
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 566
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 566
public health and human services and the Montana veterans' affairs division, in consultation with the
department of public health and human services, shall prepare a detailed written report and present a detailed
report it to the state administrative administration and veterans' affairs interim committee in accordance with 5-
11-210, including but not limited to results of the study, recommendations for legislative actions, and
recommendations for changes to the conduct of future studies."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 566
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 566, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 566
INTRODUCED BY M. BERTOGLIO, C. COCHRAN, E. TILLEMAN, C. SPRUNGER, B. BARKER, L.
BREWSTER, K. KORTUM, L. REKSTEN, J. DARLING
AN ACT REVISING THE DECENNIAL VETERANS' LONG-TERM CARE NEEDS STUDY; MOVING PRIMARY
RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE SURVEY FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES TO THE MONTANA VETERANS' AFFAIRS DIVISION; REQUIRING THE INVOLVEMENT OF
STAKEHOLDERS; REQUIRING THE PREPARATION OF A STUDY PLAN AND BUDGET ESTIMATE;
REVISING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND AMENDING SECTIONS 10-2-901, 10-2-902, AND 10-2-903,
MCA.”